Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 31A Master Commissioners and Receivers

31A.010.
Master commissioners.

A master commissioner may be appointed for each county within a judicial circuit.

In single-judge circuits the appointment shall be made by the Circuit Judge.

In judicial circuits with more than one (1) judge the master commissioner shall be chosen by a majority of the judges and in the event of a tie the Chief Circuit Judge shall choose from those receiving the tie vote.

The master commissioner shall be governed by such rules not inconsistent with the statutes of the Commonwealth as may be set by the Supreme Court.

The master commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the court as follows:

In a single-judge circuit the master commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the Circuit Judge, but in no case shall his term exceed four (4) years without reappointment. The term of the commissioner shall automatically terminate following the death, resignation, or permanent replacement of the Circuit Judge who appointed him.

In a judicial circuit with more than one (1) judge the master commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the judges of the circuit, but in no case shall his term exceed four (4) years without reappointment. The master commissioner may be removed at any time by a majority vote of the judges of the circuit and in the event of a tie the decision shall be made by the Chief Circuit Judge.

Each commissioner shall annually provide to the Administrative Office of the Courts a complete accounting for all amounts received and distributed and for all fees collected. The master commissioner shall be compensated by fees as provided by rule of the Supreme Court. Fees collected in excess of the authorized compensation and expenses of the master commissioner shall be remitted with the report to the Administrative Office of the Courts to inure to a trust and agency account which shall not lapse and which shall be used to hire additional deputy clerks or office personnel, to increase deputy clerk or office personnel salaries, or a combination thereof. The Circuit Court may allow the commissioner a reasonable fee for performing judicial type functions in actions where the master commissioner does not execute a judicial sale.

The master commissioner shall maintain his office at such locations and during such hours as authorized by rule of the Supreme Court.

The master commissioner shall perform such functions, including those of a receiver, as may be directed by an appropriate order of court.

The master commissioner may have such deputies and assistants, as authorized by rule of the Supreme Court, as are necessary to perform the functions of his office.

The Supreme Court may make such rules, regulations, and accounting procedures as it may deem necessary for the appointment, conduct, and other matters relating to the master commissioner or receiver.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 48, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 222, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(2), § 1, effective March 20, 2005.

31A.020.
Bond — Special bond.

The master commissioner shall execute a bond, with surety approved by the court. The bond shall be recorded in court. He shall execute a special bond when required by the court and no action shall be maintained on his general bond for matters covered by a special bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 49, effective January 2, 1978.

31A.030.
Oath.

The master commissioner shall take an oath that he will faithfully and honestly discharge the duties of his office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 50, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Oath to Receivers (Master Commissioner), Form 11.09.

31A.040.
Special commissioner.

When the master commissioner is interested as an attorney or party; or

When there is other conflict of interest; or

When he is otherwise unable to discharge the duties of his office for any reason;

the judge of the court before whom the action is pending shall appoint a special commissioner, who shall meet the same qualifications as a master commissioner, and require him to take an oath and execute a bond as the regular commissioner is required to do.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 51, effective January 2, 1978.

31A.080.
Receivers — Persons not to be appointed receivers.

Receivers, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, may be appointed under the same terms and conditions as a master commissioner.

Except for personal representatives, guardians, curators and committees for persons of unsound mind, neither a party to an action, nor his attorney, nor any person interested therein, shall be appointed as a receiver unless by agreement of the parties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 52, effective January 2, 1978.

31A.120.
Use of proof of and performance of duties of predecessor.

The master commissioner or receiver may use any proof reduced to writing and signed by his predecessor, and may execute any order or judgment which it was the duty of his predecessor to have executed, and which remains unexecuted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 53, effective January 2, 1978.

31A.990.
Penalties.

If any master commissioner or receiver fails to comply with his duties as defined by appropriate court order, he shall be guilty of a violation, and, upon conviction, shall be removed from office.

If any master commissioner or receiver knowingly omits or fails to report, as required by court order or Supreme Court rule, a correct statement of the amount required to be reported, or the amount of his office expenses, or knowingly makes or subscribes any false statement concerning the same, he shall be guilty of a Class D felony, and the judgment of conviction shall declare the office vacant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see KRS

532.020

.